Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. In General
§ 20-2-116.
Revision of alimony and other allowances.

After a decree for alimony or other allowance for a party or children and after a decree for the appointment of trustees to receive and hold any property for the use of a party or children pursuant to W.S.

20-2-314

, the court may from time to time, on the petition of either of the parties, revise and alter the decree respecting the amount of the alimony or allowance or the payment thereof and respecting the appropriation and payment of the principal and income of the property so held in trust and may make any decree respecting any of the matters which the court might have made in the original action.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 1587; R.S. 1899, § 3004; C.S. 1910, § 3940; C.S. 1920, § 5006; R.S. 1931, § 35-124; C.S. 1945, § 3-5922; W.S. 1957, § 20-66; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-116

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Implied-in-fact modification.—

District court,
which required a father to pay 75% of his daughter's residential treatment
costs, did not clearly err in rejecting the father's claim of an implied-in-fact
modification of the parties' divorce agreement. The views reflected
in the parties' testimony, coupled with the lack of any discussion
between the parties as to cost sharing, made it objectively unreasonable
to find an implied-in-fact agreement to modify the divorce agreement. Samiec v. Hopkins, 2015 WY 131, 358 P.3d 506,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2015).

Property settlement contracts favored. —

A husband and wife may not only enter a property settlement contract but it is favored in the law and should be enforced if legally possible. Pavlica v. Pavlica, 587 P.2d 639,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1978).

Court cannot modify money judgment. —

This section, authorizing the court to alter a decree for alimony or allowance for children, cannot be interpreted as permitting it to interfere with or modify what has become a money judgment. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976); Paul v. Paul, 631 P.2d 1060,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1981).

Or decree containing agreed property settlement. —

A trial court does not have power to modify a decree insofar as it contains an agreed property settlement or if it is in the nature of a property settlement. Pavlica v. Pavlica, 587 P.2d 639,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1978); Paul v. Paul, 631 P.2d 1060,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1981).

A provision in a divorce decree calling for payment of a sum certain — $800 a month for 10 years — and fixing the obligation as a lien upon real property in order to secure the payment even after the death of the parties was in fact a part of the property settlement and the trial court was without justification to change the payments. McMillan v. McMillan, 702 P.2d 1279,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1985).

As no continuing jurisdiction over spouses. —

To say that the court has a continuing jurisdiction and a responsibility to revise its provisions for the custody of children, according to their best interest and welfare, is not to say the court retains the same kind of continuing jurisdiction with respect to the civil rights of the parents, as between each other. Pavlica v. Pavlica, 587 P.2d 639,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1978).

Foreign judgment subject to section. —

If a foreign judgment for divorce with provisions for alimony and support is to be entered in a district court of this state with the same force and effect as a judgment of this state, it must be subject to the provisions of this section. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

Modification denied. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in finding the father was voluntarily underemployed and in refusing to modify alimony as the district court was not bound to modify alimony because it modified the child support; the alimony served a different purpose and was not awarded solely on the basis of income but was, to a degree, in lieu of property available for division; and the court was justified in considering employment expectancy reasonably created by the father’s experience, capability and physical ability when it refused to modify the original award, notwithstanding the imputed income it used to modify child support. Linden v. Linden, 2020 WY 9, 455 P.3d 1254,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2020).

Equitable powers of court not abrogated. —

The grant of statutory power to provide for the custody and care of children in connection with a divorce decree does not abrogate the equitable powers of the court existing independent thereof. It follows from this that the equitable powers of the court likewise exist in an action having to do with unpaid child support installments. Wardle v. Wardle, 464 P.2d 854,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1970).

Agreement by parties has no effect on power of court to modify. —

Under this section giving the court a general power to modify a decree for alimony or support, the exercise of that power is not affected by the fact that the decree is based on an agreement entered into by the parties to the action. Buchler v. Buchler, 65 Wyo. 452, 202 P.2d 670,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1949).

Courts have power to refuse judicial approval of agreement

between husband and wife as to payments for support of herself and children, with a provision that it would bind the parties, their heirs, executors, administrators and assigns. Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

Proceeding to modify divorce decree is filed under same docket assigned in original proceeding.

Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

But separate and distinct case. —

A modification proceeding involves new issues framed by facts differing from those existing when the original decree was entered. A new adjudication of the rights of the parties must be made. For all intents and purposes it is a separate and distinct case from the original proceeding. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

Changed circumstances basis for modification. —

The whole theory which admits of a modification is that a condition which affected the interest and welfare of the child and parties either no longer exists or has so materially changed that there is a new situation presented which requires a new adjudication. Rubeling v. Rubeling, 406 P.2d 283,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1965).

No modification of the decree can be made except for change in circumstances. Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

Provisions in a decree of divorce for payments for support of wife and children meant alimony, so that court may reduce allowance when changed circumstances demand. Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

A change of circumstances must exist in order to warrant revision of an allowance of alimony to a wife under this section. Buchler v. Buchler, 65 Wyo. 452, 202 P.2d 670,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1949).

Proof of change of circumstances is required in a support modification proceeding, even though it is proved that the support requirements are, for practical purposes, impossible of attainment by the father. Rubeling v. Rubeling, 406 P.2d 283,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1965).

As long as the circumstances and conditions continue unchanged, there is no lawful power or authority in the supreme court to supplant the prior judgment of the trial court by any type of modification. Rubeling v. Rubeling, 406 P.2d 283,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1965).

Any modification of the judgment nisi by a court of this state must be consistent with previous decisions of the supreme court declaring that a modification hearing is not a time to reconsider the evidence and premises upon which the original judgment was entered, but only to consider whether there has been such change of circumstances as to warrant a different decree. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

Trial court did not abuse discretion in determining no substantial change in circumstances warranting modification or termination of husband's alimony obligation to his wife because husband failed to provide appellate court with an adequate record, including properly authenticated trial transcript or statement of the evidence pursuant to Wyo. R. App. P. 3.03, to permit rational review of trial court's decision, and appellate court presumed reliability of trial court's decision and competency of evidence upon which that decision was based.
Schluck v. Schluck, 2008 WY 92, 189 P.3d 877,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2008).

There is a strong presumption that original alimony decree was reasonable.

Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

Courts should proceed with caution in modifying any alimony decree.

Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

And burden upon party seeking revision. —

The burden of clearly proving there has been substantial change in the circumstances of the party or parties to alimony decree making such modification just and equitable is upon the party seeking the revision. Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

Petitioning husband failed to show that the trial court did not exercise sound judgment or otherwise abused its discretion by providing continuing support to the wife through an award of alimony; even though the husband's income had decreased since the divorce, only two years had elapsed since the date of the original decree, and the husband expected more income after completing an electrical apprenticeship. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

Admission of testimony. —

On application to modify alimony decree, under this section, testimony as to original circumstances and evidence introduced on original trial, such as, that husband admitted that advances were made to him by wife, were properly admitted. Moore v. Moore, 33 Wyo. 230, 237 P. 235,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1925).

Proper evidence. —

Where husband could not continue to make payments provided for in decree without assistance from his father, it was proper to show that owing to father's change in circumstances the assistance could not be made by the father. Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

Test for decision in alimony revision,

like child support, is in the exercised discretion of the district court, and that decision will not be disturbed on appeal absent clear abuse. Dorr v. Newman, 785 P.2d 1172,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1990).

Trial court has broad discretion

in revision of alimony. Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

The propriety of child support and maintenance and the determination relative to the amount thereof is within the discretion of the trial court and may be modified by the court as the circumstances require. Booker v. Booker, 626 P.2d 561,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1981).

Change of circumstances. —

Where change of husband's circumstances are such that he cannot make payments it is incumbent on the court to alter the decree. Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

Obligation not automatically cancelled by remarriage. —

Remarriage can be considered a sufficient change of circumstances to terminate alimony, but it does not automatically terminate alimony payments without amendatory court action. Maher v. Maher, 2004 WY 62, 90 P.3d 739,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2004).

Failure to achieve same earning level constitutes change in financial condition,

and when the supporting spouse's financial condition has become so impaired he is unable to meet the obligation imposed by the original decree, it is incumbent upon the court to modify that support provision. Jones v. Jones, 858 P.2d 289,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1993).

Court found no merit in a former husband's argument that his unrealized belief that he would receive sufficient earnings to cover both his living expenses and alimony payments upon moving to another state constituted a failed expectation supporting his claim that a substantial change in circumstances occurred. Maher v. Maher, 2004 WY 62, 90 P.3d 739,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2004).

Court cannot modify award of alimony after payment completed. —

A district court may not modify, under this section, a durational award of alimony after full payment is completed unless the divorce decree specifies otherwise. Harshfield v. Harshfield, 842 P.2d 535,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1992).

Award vacated absent evidence of ability, need. —

An award of alimony to the husband in the amount of $120,000, to be paid in monthly installments of $1,000 over a period of 10 years, was vacated, where there was scant evidence of either the wife's ability to pay alimony or the husband's need for support. Sellers v. Sellers, 775 P.2d 1029,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1989).

Obligation not automatically canceled by remarriage. —

Where the separation agreement and the decree into which it was incorporated made no provision for automatic termination of alimony upon remarriage, the remedy available to the alimony obligor was reserved to a petition to modify the decree. Remarriage could be a change of circumstance, but it did not automatically cancel the obligation provided in the decree without amendatory court action. Swetich v. Smith, 802 P.2d 869,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1990).

Alimony extended after remarriage. —

Alimony may be extended after termination of the original term of payment has expired, including such a circumstance as remarriage. Richardson v. Richardson, 868 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1994).

Application for modification because of remarriage may be refused where allowance of alimony in the nature of settlement for advances. —

A husband's application for modification of a decree awarding alimony to his wife, because of her remarriage, may be refused on the ground that the wife has made advances of money to her husband and the allowance of alimony is in the nature of a settlement thereof. Warren v. Warren, 361 P.2d 525,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1961).

Death of payor. —

This section changed the common law and allows, under the continuing jurisdiction of the court to modify the divorce decree, alimony payments to continue after the death of the payor spouse, if the decree intends to require such continued payments by using language such as “alimony will continue for her the spouse's lifetime”. Oedekoven v. Oedekoven, 920 P.2d 649,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1996).

Voluntary assumption of costs insufficient grounds for modification. —

The voluntary assumption of the costs of a new home and family after a divorce decree and property settlement agreement are not the changes in circumstances which normally require a modification of the decree. Booker v. Booker, 626 P.2d 561,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1981).

Bankruptcy proceedings justify modification. —

The court may treat the results of a bankruptcy proceeding as a change of circumstances justifying modification of the original decree. Richardson v. Richardson, 868 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1994).

Acquisition of large mortgage or airplane insufficient to terminate alimony. —

Accepted Wyoming law does not accommodate the purchase of a house for over $200,000 with a large mortgage or the acquisition of an airplane for tax loss writeoff purposes as a required “change of circumstance” sufficient to terminate alimony. Johnson v. Johnson, 717 P.2d 335,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 529

(Wyo. 1986).

Judge may delete language sounding in property settlement upon determining payments alimony. —

Considering the substantially equal division of the marriage property and the stated purpose of the payments provided for in the divorce decree — to support the wife due to her “lack of a college education, lack of employable skills, and medical condition” —, the trial judge did not err in his determination that these payments were indeed alimony, and in his deletion of language sounding in property settlement, i.e., “That should plaintiff die prior to said alimony being paid in full, plaintiff's estate, assignees and devisees shall be liable for the balance.” Yates v. Yates, 702 P.2d 1252,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1985).

Violation of custody provisions

in a divorce decree constitutes a change in circumstances sufficient to justify the cancelling of arrearages and suspending of future payments. Wardle v. Wardle, 464 P.2d 854,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1970).

Removal of children from state,

without the father's consent, may be a sufficient change of circumstances to justify suspending or reducing support payments until the children have been returned. Wardle v. Wardle, 464 P.2d 854,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1970).

When matter of wife's need becomes material. —

Where a husband seeks to terminate his alimony payments, the matter of his wife's need does not become material and should not be considered unless and until a sufficient factual showing of material change of circumstances or conditions has been made to justify any modification of the decree. Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

When final judgment is entered, discretionary powers of courts are exhausted.

Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976); Pavlica v. Pavlica, 587 P.2d 639,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1978); Paul v. Paul, 631 P.2d 1060,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1981).

Just because the final judgment for a fixed sum of money grows out of a divorce action, this does not continue the power of the court granting the divorce or a subsequent court having jurisdiction of the matter to extend the time for payment thereof or otherwise modify the same. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

There is no provision in this section which permits the court, having entered a final and complete judgment, to allow the judgment to be paid over a period of time or to be subject to qualifications that do not pertain to other judgments. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

Court's judgment will not be disturbed upon appeal

in the absence of a clearly demonstrated abuse of discretion. Heyl v. Heyl, 518 P.2d 28,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1974).

Record held to show change in circumstances

to justify the reduction in payments provided for in original decree. — See Lonabaugh v. Lonabaugh, 46 Wyo. 23, 22 P.2d 199,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1933).

Attorney's fee in connection with modification hearing. —

Where the district court ordered an attorney's fee of $100 to be paid by the husband to the wife for the modification proceedings heard in the district court, and this fee was intended to cover services rendered on behalf of the wife in the district court, for services rendered or to be rendered in the supreme court it would be better for the supreme court to say whether a further payment should be made, and if so how much. Rubeling v. Rubeling, 406 P.2d 283,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1965).

Applied

in

Hasty v. Hasty, 828 P.2d 94,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Hendrickson v. Hendrickson, 583 P.2d 1265,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1978); Cubin v. Cubin, 685 P.2d 680,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1984); Broyles v. Broyles, 711 P.2d 1119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Parry v. Parry, 766 P.2d 1168,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1989); Underkofler v. Underkofler, 834 P.2d 1140,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Alimony in an Ex Parte Proceeding,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 72 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Husband's default, contempt or other misconduct as affecting modification of decree for support, 6 ALR2d 835.

Power of court to modify provisions of divorce decree as to alimony, as respects past due installments, 6 ALR2d 1277, 52 ALR3d 156.

Changing financial condition or needs of husband or wife as ground for modification of decree for alimony or maintenance, 18 ALR2d 10.

Necessity of personal service within state upon nonresident spouse as prerequisite of court's power to modify its decree as to alimony or child support in matrimonial action, 62 ALR2d 544.

Income tax as a factor in readjusting alimony, 51 ALR3d 461.

Retrospective increase in allowance for alimony, separate maintenance or support, 52 ALR3d 156.

Power of court to modify decree for support, alimony or the like, based on agreement of parties, 61 ALR3d 520.

Father's liability for support of child furnished after divorce decree which awarded custody to mother but made no provision for support, 91 ALR3d 530.

Divorced woman's subsequent sexual relations or misconduct as warranting, alone or with other circumstances, modification of alimony decree, 98 ALR3d 453.

Removal of child from jurisdiction as justifying termination, suspension, or reduction of child support payments, 8 ALR4th 1231.

Excessiveness or adequacy of amount of money awarded as permanent alimony following divorce, 28 ALR4th 786.

Reconciliation as affecting decree for limited divorce, separation, alimony, separate maintenance or spousal support, 36 ALR4th 502.

Divorced or separated spouse's living with member of opposite sex as affecting other spouse's obligation of alimony or support under separation agreement, 47 ALR4th 38.

Court's authority to reinstitute parent's support obligation after terms of prior decree have been fulfilled, 48 ALR4th 952.

Right to attorneys' fees in proceeding, after absolute divorce, for modification of child custody or support order, 57 ALR4th 710.

Power to modify spousal support award for a limited term, issued in conjunction with divorce, so as to extend the term or make the award permanent, 62 ALR4th 180.

Divorce: voluntary contributions to child's education expenses as factor justifying modification of spousal support award, 63 ALR4th 436.

Divorce: court's authority to institute or increase spousal support award after discharge of prior property award in bankruptcy, 87 ALR4th 353.

Alimony as affected by recipient spouse's remarriage in absence of controlling specific statute, 47 ALR5th 129.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of lump-sum alimony award, 49 ALR5th 441.

Alimony or child-support awards as subject to attorneys' liens, 49 ALR5th 595.

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

Consideration of obligor's personal injury recovery or settlement in fixing alimony or child support, 59 ALR5th 489.

Retirement of husband as change of circumstances warranting modification of divorce decree — Prospective retirement, 110 ALR5th 237.

§ 20-2-117.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-1-113

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 4.

§ 20-2-118.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-315

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.